North Carolina, session 2025, SB690.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 93E-1-4 is amended by adding the following new subdivisions
to read:
"(5a) "Appraiser Qualifications Board" means the board established by the
Appraisal Foundation to set nationwide minimum education, registration,
experience, and examination standards for real estate appraiser licensure and
certification.
(5b) "Approved PAREA program" means a course or program developed by a
third-party provider that has been approved by the Appraiser Qualifications
Board and the Appraisal Board, which meets the standards for Practical
Applications of Real Estate Appraisal and satisfies the experience
requirements for real estate appraiser licensure or certification as required by
this Chapter.
…
(9a) "Practical Applications of Real Estate Appraisal" means the program
framework established by the Appraiser Qualifications Board, providing an
alternative to the traditional supervisor and trainee method for satisfying real
estate appraisal experience requirements through technology-based training,
case studies, and supervision by qualified mentors."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 93E-1-6 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) An applicant for certification as a certified residential real estate appraiser may satisfy
the experience requirements of subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this section by completing all
of the following:
(1) Completing an approved PAREA program for certification as a certified
residential real estate appraiser.
(2) Submitting 15 appraisals of residential real estate to the Appraisal Board of
which the Appraisal Board will choose five to review for compliance with the
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 93E-1-6(a1), as amended by this section, is repealed effective
December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.(d) The North Carolina Appraisal Board may adopt rules to implement
the provisions of this section.
*S690-v-5*

SECTION 1.(e) Subsection (d) of this section is effective when it becomes law. The
remainder of this section becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to applications
submitted for certification as a certified residential real estate appraiser on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 78A-36(b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 78A-36. Registration requirement.
(b) It is unlawful for any dealer to employ a salesman unless the salesman is registered.
The registration of a salesman is not effective during any period when he is not associated with
a particular dealer registered under this Chapter. When a salesman begins or terminates those
activities which make him a salesman, the salesman as well as the dealer shall promptly notify
the Administrator.
The Administrator may by rule or order require the return of a salesman's license upon the
termination of those activities which make him a salesman or, if such return is impossible, require
a bond or evidence satisfactory to the Administrator of such impossibility. No salesman may be
registered with more than one dealer.dealer unless each of the dealers in which employs or
associates with the salesman is under common ownership or control, or the registration is
otherwise allowed by a rule or order of the Administrator."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 42-46(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) Out-of-Pocket Expenses and Litigation Costs. – In addition to the late fees referenced
in subsections (a) and (b) of this section and the administrative fees of a landlord referenced in
subsections (e) through (g) of this section, a landlord also is permitted to charge and recover from
a tenant the following actual out-of-pocket expenses:
(1) Filing fees charged by the court.
(2) Costs for service of process pursuant to G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4 of the North
Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure and G.S. 42-29.
(3) If the landlord is the prevailing party, reasonable Reasonable attorneys' fees
actually paid or owed, pursuant to a written lease, not to exceed fifteen percent
(15%) of the amount owed by the tenant, or fifteen percent (15%) of the
monthly rent stated in the lease if the eviction is based on a default other than
the nonpayment of rent.
(4) In cases where a tenant appeals a summary ejectment to district court, court
and the landlord is the prevailing party, a landlord is entitled to an award of
all actual reasonable attorneys' fees paid or owed if a court determines that the
tenant knew, or should have known, the appeal was frivolous, unreasonable,
without foundation, or in bad faith or solely for the purpose of delaydelay."
SECTION 3.(b) This section, being a clarifying amendment, has a retroactive
effective date of September 9, 2024.
SECTION 4.(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, "Offer and Sales
Contracts Rule" means 21 NCAC 58A .0112 (Offer and Sales Contracts).
SECTION 4.(b) Offer and Sales Contracts Rule. – Until the effective date of the
revised permanent rule that the Commission is required to adopt pursuant to subsection (d) of
this section, the Commission shall implement the Offer and Sales Contracts Rule as provided in
subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 4.(c) Implementation. – A broker acting as an agent in a real estate
transaction may use a preprinted offer or sales contract form containing provisions concerning
the payment of a commission or compensation, including the forfeiture of earnest money, to a
broker or firm.
SECTION 4.(d) Additional Rulemaking Authority. – The Commission shall adopt
a rule to amend the Offer and Sales Contracts Rule consistent with subsection (c) of this section.
Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rule adopted by the Commission pursuant to this section
shall be substantively identical to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. Rules adopted
Page 2 Senate Bill 690-Ratified

pursuant to this section are not subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall become effective as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), as though 10 or more written objections had been received as provided in
G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 4.(e) Sunset. – This section expires when permanent rules adopted as
required by subsection (d) of this section become effective.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Senate Bill 690-Ratified Page 3